Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Trust Registration

386.650.
“Court” defined. [Repealed.]

386.651.
“Trust” defined. [Repealed.]

386.653.
Applicability of KRS 386.650 to 386.735 to all trusts. [Repealed.]

386.655.
Trust registration — Duty to register. [Repealed.]

386.660.
Procedures. [Repealed.]

386.665.
Effect of registration — Notice of proceedings. [Repealed.]

386.670.
Failure to register. [Repealed.]